Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.031

Late registration fee.

A late fee of one and one-half percent per month shall be assessed on registration fees received after April 1st.

[ 2000 c 100 s 4; 1994 c 178 s 5; 1993 c 89 s 10; 1988 c 4 s 8; 1981 c 296 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 362 s 9. Formerly RCW 15.60.043.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.